Massachusetts, session 194th, S2762.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following new section:-
Section 37. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Executive office”, The Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities.
“Low and moderate income”, income is not less than 70 percent, or more than 120
percent of the area median income as defined by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development.
''Mixed-use development'', development containing a mix of residential uses and non-
residential uses, including, without limitation, commercial, institutional, industrial or other uses.
“Permanently affordable”, a housing unit subject to an affordable housing restriction in
perpetuity pursuant to Section 31 of Chapter 184.
of 3

(b)(1) Subject to appropriation, the executive office shall establish the permanent
affordability homeownership program to aid in the development and construction of permanently
affordable homeownership opportunities for low and moderate income home buyers in the
Commonwealth. The executive office may, on behalf of the commonwealth, accept and expend
federal funds to carry out this section.
(2) Funding allocation and expenditures shall be subject to the following criteria;
provided, that the executive office shall determine the process by which funding is allocated, the
amount of funding provided per housing units and the specific expenses covered under the
program:
(i) Funds expended from the program shall only be used to fund the creation of
permanently affordable homeownership units; provided, however, that the funds may be used to
fund permanently affordable homeownership units within a mixed-use development project.
(ii) Funds expended for the program shall only be used on permanently affordable
homeownership units affordable to low and moderate income households
(iii) Funds expended from the program shall only be used to fund housing projects with 1
to 25 units.
(c) The secretary of housing and livable communities shall report annually to the clerks
of the house of representatives and the senate, who shall forward the report to the house of
representatives and the senate and the chairs of the joint committee on housing, on the activities
and status of the program. The report shall include a list and description of all projects that
received funds under the program, the amount of each grant, the number of housing units created
of 3

by each grant, the number of housing units created at each affordability level, and the size of the
projects funded.
SECTION 2. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate
regulations pursuant to section 37 of chapter 23B, as inserted by this act, no later than December
31, 2027.
of 3